California, session 20252026, SB106.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Item 4140-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4140-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information ........................ 140,253,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 36,133,000 (1.5) 3831-Health Care Quality and Affordability ........................ 100,620,000 (2) 3840-Facilities Development ........................ 3,500,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Item 4140-001-0001 to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. 2. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $18,667,000 is available to fund grant awards for existing primary care residency slots, up to $3,333,000 is available to fund new primary care residency slots at existing residency programs, and up to $5,667,000 is available to fund primary care residency slots for existing teaching health centers under the Song-Brown Health Care Workforce Training Act (Article 1 (commencing with Section 128200) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code). Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $3,333,000 is available to fund newly accredited primary care residency programs and, as of June 30, 2027, unspent amounts may be redirected to fund new residency slots at existing programs if newly accredited primary care residency programs have not been established. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $333,000 is available for the State Loan Repayment Program. (b) The funds described in Provision 2 are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,800,000 shall be available to support the California Medicine Scholars Program. These funds shall continue to be appropriated annually. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,000,000 shall be available to the Northeast Valley Health Corporation for infrastructure improvements and expansion. 6. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (2), $500,000 shall be available to the American Reproductive Centers Fertility Clinic in Palm Springs for repairs and structure improvements. 7. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,000,000 shall be available to the Youth Mental Health Academy for a Los Angeles cohort. 8. The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall continue to seek regular stakeholder input from members of the formal Advisory Workgroup until June 30, 2026. The Advisory Workgroup shall be composed of a majority of active community health workers, Promotores and Promotores de Salud, or their representatives or representative organizations. The Advisory Workgroup may advise the department on current and future policy recommendations regarding the community health worker and promotores workforce. These recommendations may include, but are not limited to, issues related to career development, organizational capacity building, access to and delivery of training, and standards for certification or program accreditation. 9. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $90,000,000 is available for funding grants to family planning providers for the provision of family planning services and family planning-related services, as described in subdivision (n) of, and paragraph (8) of subdivision (aa) of, Section 14132 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (b) The Department of Health Care Access and Information, in consultation with the California Health and Human Services Agency, shall determine the methodology and distribution of the grant funds appropriated for the purposes described in this provision. An application for a grant under this provision shall include justification for the amount of grant funds requested, as determined by the Department of Health Care Access and Information. (c) Eligible recipients of grant funds are limited to community clinics licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code that provide family planning and family planning-related services and that demonstrate they are subject to an elimination of federal financial participation on or after July 4, 2025. (d) Up to $1,500,000 appropriated in this item may be used for state operations, and transferred to Item 4140-001-0001, and allocated to a third-party administrator through a grant or contract, to support the administration of the grant program. (e) The Department of Health Care Access and Information may execute grants and contracts, including exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts and grants entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual. (f) Contracts, grants, and related information created or obtained pursuant to this provision shall not be made public and are exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). The Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest: in order to protect confidential and personal medical information, the safety of medical providers, and access to reproductive health and family planning services, it is necessary that grants, contracts, and related information created or obtained pursuant to this provision are exempt from disclosure. SEC. 2. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately.